Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Chapter 9. County Port Authority or Development Commission

§ 59-9-1.
Declaration of public policy.

It is hereby declared that the public policy of the State of Mississippi is to encourage the expansion and development of Mississippi’s harbors and ports.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 26.

§ 59-9-3.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally and broadly to effectuate the purposes set out herein and wide latitude and discretion shall be vested in the public authorities charged with the exercise of the powers and duties conferred upon them by this chapter, except as in the chapter otherwise expressly limited.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as repealing or altering existing laws affecting ports, and this chapter is to be considered as supplementary and cumulative. The grant of powers to the board of supervisors of such county, the county port authority, the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, and the port commission, where granted herein by reference to existing statutes, shall incorporate such statutes herein seriatim, and the subsequent amendment or repeal of such statutes shall not limit or rescind the powers and authority hereby conferred unless expressly so provided in such amending or repealing statute.

The enumeration of any specific rights and powers contained in this chapter, where followed by general powers, shall not be construed in a restrictive sense, but rather in as broad and comprehensive a sense as possible to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

A county development commission shall have all rights, duties and powers vested upon a county port authority by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7605-02, 7605-06, 7605-25, 7605-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, §§ 2, 6, 25, 26; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, §§ 2, 6; Laws, 1960, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex. Sess. ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1971).

§ 59-9-5.
Definitions.

The term “industrial operations” as used in this chapter shall include but not be limited to any and all enterprises, the operation of which will aid in the development of fisheries, shipyard operations, commerce, navigation or shipping in the port, as well as all forms of manufacturing enterprises, tourism enterprises, and service enterprises.

Wherever the words “county port authority” appear in this chapter, such words shall be deemed to be identical in meaning and in context with the words “county development commission”.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7605-02, 7605-12; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, §§ 2, 12; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after June 1, 1988.

§ 59-9-7.
Creation of county port authority or development commission; composition; jurisdiction.

Any county in the State of Mississippi bordering on the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico in which county there is or may hereafter be located a municipality having a harbor or port of entry where commodities are exported to foreign nations, and where there is or may hereafter be maintained a channel and/or harbor or port to a depth of not less than twenty (20) feet, and where the board of supervisors of such county shall find and determine that public necessity and convenience requires the same, as evidenced by a resolution adopted and entered on the official minutes of such board, shall have a port authority to be known as the county port authority, but in any such county having four (4) incorporated municipalities therein, such county port authority shall be called and known as the development commission of such county. The county port authority shall be composed of seven (7) resident citizens of such county, who shall be qualified electors therein, but in any such county where a county development commission has been created, such county development commission shall be composed of twelve (12) resident citizens of such county, who shall be qualified electors therein. Such county port authority or county development commission shall have jurisdiction over the ports, terminals, harbors, channels, and passes leading thereto, and all vessels, boats, and wharves, common carriers and public utilities therein, using the same within the county, and not under the jurisdiction of any municipal port commission and exclusive of the jurisdiction of the port commission of any municipality in which a port of entry is located. But by joint resolutions adopted by the governing authorities of the county and the municipality, such county port authority or county development commission may be vested with joint and concurrent jurisdiction over all or any part of said port of entry, or the channels, harbors, or passes leading thereto, outside of the corporate limits of such municipality, and within such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 59-9-9.
Appointment, oath, bond, and terms of office of members.

A county port authority shall be appointed as follows: two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor, and shall be qualified electors of the county and of the municipality in which the port of entry is located; five (5) members shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of such county; each supervisors district bordering on the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico shall have at least one (1) member on such county port authority.

The members of any county port authority created as a county development commission shall be appointed as follows: Two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor, and shall be qualified electors of the county and of a municipality which is a port of entry in such county; five (5) members shall be appointed, one (1) each by the governing authorities of each incorporated municipality in such county, and five (5) members shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of such county; each supervisors district bordering on the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico shall have at least one (1) member on such county development commission. After the expiration of the terms in effect on July 1, 1995, the members of the county development commission for Harrison County, Mississippi, which are appointed by the Governor shall be qualified electors of the county.

Before entering upon the duties of the office, each member of such county port authority or county development commission shall take and subscribe to the oath of office required by Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi and shall give bond to be approved by the board of supervisors of such county in the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties. Such bond shall be made payable to the county, and in case of a breach thereof, suit may be brought thereon upon the relation of the county for the benefit of the county port authority or county development commission. The members of such county port authority or county development commission shall hold office for a term of four (4) years from the date of their appointment and qualification, and until their successor or successors shall be appointed and qualify as set out herein. The members of any municipal port commission shall be eligible for appointment as members of any county port authority or county development commission, but they shall not be paid additional compensation for attending any joint meeting of the county port authority or county development commission and the municipal port commission.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, successors to members of a county development commission whose terms expire in the calendar year 1962, shall be appointed as follows: two (2) members by the Governor for a two-year term, four (4) members by the mayor of each incorporated municipality in the county for a three-year term; and five (5) members by the board of supervisors for a term of four (4) years. Succeeding appointments to the county development commission shall be for a term of four (4) years or until their successors are appointed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-02; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 314, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 432, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 59-9-11.
Organization; meetings.

When the members of a county port authority or county development commission shall have been appointed and shall have qualified as set out herein, they shall meet at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors of such county, after giving at least five days’ notice of the time and place of such meeting by publication in any newspaper published in the county seat of such county. At such meetings they shall elect a president and a secretary, who shall be members of the county port authority or county development commission, and adopt such rules as may govern the time and place for holding subsequent meetings, regular and special, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-03; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 3.

§ 59-9-13.
Compensation of members.

Each member of any county port authority or county development commission created under the provisions of this chapter shall receive per diem compensation in the amount provided by Section 25-3-69 for each day engaged in attendance of meetings of the county port authority or county development commission or engaged in other duties of the county port authority or county development commission, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) in any one (1) year, and shall receive their actual traveling expenses, to be audited and allowed by the county port authority or county development commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 5; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 394, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 456; Laws, 1984, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1984).

§ 59-9-15.
General powers and duties of authority or commission; director; additional clerical assistance; commission may enter into joint venture for construction and operation of facilities under jurisdiction of commission.

The duties and powers of a county port authority or county development commission shall be the same, as to matters within their jurisdiction, as those set forth and prescribed by law, and as the same may be amended from time to time, relating to the duties and powers of a municipal port commission. The board of supervisors, on recommendation of the county port authority or county development commission, may appoint a county port director. The salary of the county port director shall be subject to the approval of the board of supervisors of such county, and the county port director so appointed may be the port director employed by the port commission of the municipality, in which case the board of supervisors of such county and the governing authorities of the municipality may jointly agree on pro rata payments toward the salary and expenses of such port director. The members of such county port authority or county development commission and the county port di rector shall be public officers within the meaning and the intent of Section 97-11-19, Mississippi Code of 1972. The clerk of the board of supervisors of any county which has appointed a county port authority or county development commission is authorized to employ such additional clerical assistance as may be necessary or required in view of the additional duties imposed upon the board by this chapter, but no employee shall receive a salary of more than Thirty-six Hundred Dollars ($3600.00) per annum.

In addition to the general powers and duties of a county port commission or county development commission, a county port commission or development commission may enter into joint ventures or community alliances with private entities or other county port commissions or county development commissions to construct and operate any facilities under the jurisdiction of such commissions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 4; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 4; Laws, 1960, ch. 346; Laws, 2001, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 59-9-17.
General powers and authority of county; validation of prior acts.

The board of supervisors of any county in which there has been created a county port authority or county development commission as provided in this chapter, acting for and on behalf of the county, is hereby given the authority through the county port authority, county development commission, or such other agencies as hereinafter may be provided by law, to engage in work of internal improvement or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining and operating harbors, channels and other navigation projects within the county and the waters adjacent thereto and to develop land for industrial operations in connection therewith, and shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, manufacture, own, maintain, repair, equip, use, control and operate wharves, piers, docks, ways, elevators, compresses, warehouses, roadways, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, ships, vessels, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, ship components, systems, parts, fuel, tourism or service facilities and materials required or incidental to any of such purposes; and all other facilities and equipment reasonably necessary or useful in the operation of harbor facilities, and water, air and rail terminals, and such other structures, facilities, lands, property or rights therein needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, and to deepen any part of said harbor and to extend, enlarge or add to the same by dredging in any direction, including inland, and to acquire land or any estate therein needed to carry out the purposes of this chapter in connection therewith. Such harbor facilities, tourism facilities, and service facilities, except those privately owned as a part of or in connection with industrial operations, shall always be and remain under the management and control of such county through the county port authority or county development commission or such other governing agency or agencies, as may hereinafter be provided by law, or under the joint management and control of such county and the municipality in which the port of entry is located, acting through the county port authority or county development commission and municipal port commission. All prior purchases, acceptances and other acquisitions of land or estates therein by the county in conformity with the purposes of this chapter, whether or not heretofore specifically authorized by law are hereby ratified, approved and confirmed. All acts, orders and resolutions of the board of supervisors of the county and the county port authority or county development commission adopted prior to October 20, 1961 which find and adjudicate the public necessity of acquiring lands for the purposes stated in this chapter, are hereby ratified, approved and confirmed; and such acts, orders and resolutions of the board of supervisors and the county port authority or county development commission shall, without any further acts upon the part of the board of supervisors of the county or the county port authority or county development commission, have the same force and effect as if adopted pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-06; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 6; Laws, 1960, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex. Sess. ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 359, § 2, eff from and after June 1, 1988.

§ 59-9-19.
Additional powers and authority of county.

The board of supervisors of any county in which there has been created a county port authority or county development commission as provided in this chapter, acting through its county port authority or county development commission, shall have the following additional powers and authority:

To set aside or lease all or portions of said harbor facilities, wharves, docks, sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats or any necessary or useful improvements for special purposes for a term not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years.

To sell, lease or otherwise dispose of tourism facilities, service facilities, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges, facilities and land acquired for industrial or harbor operations to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial operations on such terms and conditions and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and they are hereby authorized to transfer possession and/or title to any part of all of such facilities and lands by deed, lease, contract or other customary business instrument; however, no such lease of land or facilities acquired for industrial operations shall be executed for a term in excess of ninety-nine (99) years from its date, and before the execution of the same any such deed, conveyance, lease, contract or other disposition shall be authorized by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the membership of such port authority or development commission by order or resolution entered on its minutes, which order or resolution shall set forth the substantial terms of such deed, conveyance, lease, contract or other disposition.

In the letting of contracts and in the advertisement for bids thereon, for the development, construction, repair, maintenance or operation of any structures, facilities and lands required pursuant to any of the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors and the county port authority shall comply with all of the requirements of the general laws of the State of Mississippi governing the advertisement for bids and the letting of contracts by county boards of supervisors. In the event title to any such lands under jurisdiction of the port authority or development commission is in the name of the county, no such transaction shall be consummated until and unless the same be authorized by proper resolution of the port authority or development commission and of the county, in which event the county shall join the port authority or development commission in the execution of such instrument. Any such sale or lease may be executed upon such terms and conditions and for such monetary rental or other consideration as may be found adequate and approved by the county port authority or county development commission and the board of supervisors in orders or resolutions authorizing the same. Any covenants and obligations of the lessee or purchaser to make expenditures in determined amounts and within such time or times for improvements to be erected on the land by such lessee or purchaser and to conduct thereon industrial operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined and defined in such lease or conveyance, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the port of entry and of the county and/or state in which such port is situated, shall, if included in such lease or conveyance, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such lease or conveyance in the absence of a monetary rental or other considerations; any such lease may contain reasonable provisions giving the lessee the right to remove its or his improvements upon termination of the lease. Where the rentals provided in the lease will be sufficient to fully retire the cost of the particular facility or where the monetary consideration for a deed is sufficient to fully repay the cost of land acquired for industrial operations described in said deed, contracts for construction, repairs, maintenance and operation of the facility or for the sale of the land, may be negotiated and consummated without the necessity of advertising and obtaining competitive bids therefor. Such county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall have the right to reclaim submerged lands for such purposes and shall also have the right to acquire by eminent domain proceedings, purchase or otherwise, any land or estate therein or property and rights that may be necessary for the purposes of this chapter, provided that land acquired for industrial operations by eminent domain shall be leased or shall be sold only with such provisions in the deed or lease as shall ensure that the use of the land shall be beneficial to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and the promotion of commerce through said port. The county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall have no authority or power to acquire without the consent of the owner thereof any property operated or used for port, harbor or industrial operations, or for such purposes as the county, acting through the port authority or development commission, is authorized to acquire and use such property for, where such property has been sold or leased by the county, acting through the port authority or development commission, to any person, firm or corporation for industrial operations as provided in this chapter. In the exercise of eminent domain, the county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall determine the amount and character of the land or estate therein thus to be acquired and the public necessity for such exercise and their determination shall be conclusive and shall not be subject to attack in the absence of manifold abuse of discretion or fraud on the part of said county in making such determination and said county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall have all powers and authority vested in persons or corporations having the right of eminent domain by Sections 11-27-1 through 11-27-49 and all other statutes pertinent thereto.

To accept assurances and other agreements from persons, firms and corporations who are benefited by any action of the port authority pursuant to this chapter, including agreements to save the county harmless on account of any assurances given by the county to the United States of America or any agency thereof, including the Secretary of the Army, and to enter into contracts with such persons, firms or corporations relative to the future development and use of property owned by such persons, firms or corporations.

To obligate the county by contract with persons, firms and corporations owning or agreeing to purchase property in the area benefited by any action of the port authority under the provisions of this chapter for the construction, development, improvement or expansion of channels and other navigation projects by the county at its expense and the continued maintenance and operation thereof by the county at its expense for a period of time not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years, or so long as any such person, firm or corporation continues to use said property for industrial operations.

To obtain liability insurance as deemed appropriate for the needs of the port authority or development commission. If liability insurance is in effect, the port authority or development commission may be sued by anyone affected to the extent of such insurance carried; however, immunity from suit is waived only to the extent of such liability insurance carried, and a judgment creditor shall have recourse only to the proceeds or right to proceeds of such liability insurance.

To invest funds credited to the county development commission. A county development commission is vested with authority to designate depositories of its funds and to deposit its funds in insured, interest-bearing accounts or securities guaranteed by the good faith of the United States Treasury. All funds in excess of ninety (90) days’ operating expenses, to the extent practicable, shall be invested in United States Treasury bills, interest-bearing accounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or other securities of the United States Government including United States Treasury bills, notes and bonds, federal agency securities, mortgage-backed securities guaranteed as to repayment of principal by the United States Government, or repurchase agreements and mutual funds invested in obligations of the United States Government or its agencies and repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such obligations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-06; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 6; Laws, 1960, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex. Sess. ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 348; Laws, 1988, ch. 359, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 15; Laws, 1992, ch. 352, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.